Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB874.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "public water system" in section 3 of the act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, is amended to read:Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Public water system." A system for the provision to the public of water for human consumption which has at least 15 service connections or regularly serves an average of at least 25 individuals daily at least 60 days out of the year. The 12345678910111213141516171819 following apply:(1) The term includes:[(1)] (i) Any collection, treatment, storage and distribution facilities under control of the operator of such system and used in connection with such system.[(2)] (ii) Any collection or pretreatment storage facilities not under such control which are used in connection with such a system.[(3)] (iii) A system which provides water for bottling or bulk hauling for human consumption.(2) The term does not include a facility that both is owned by a church, association of churches or other religious order, body or institution which qualifies for exemption from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501 (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.) and relies upon a privately owned water well for its drinking water supply.* * *Section 2. Section 6(b) and (c) of the act are amended to read:Section 6. Variances and exemptions.* * *(b) Variances from treatment technique requirements.--The department [may] shall authorize variances from a treatment technique required under the drinking water standards if the public water system applying for the variance demonstrates to the satisfaction of the department that the drinking water quality is in accordance wit h the current surface water treatment rules established by the United States Environmental Protection Agency or the treatment technique is not necessary to protect the health of persons because of the nature of the raw 20250HB0874PN0910 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 water sources of the system.(c) Department may authorize exemptions.--The department may exempt any public water system from any requirement of an applicable drinking water standard upon finding that:(1) due to compelling factors, the public water system is unable to comply with such requirements;(2) the public water system was in operation on the effective date of such requirement or, for a system that was not in operation by that date, only if no reasonable alternative source of drinking water is available to such a new system; and(3) the granting of the exemption will not result in an unreasonable risk to health[.] as assessed through the recognition of no recorded illnesses derived from microbial contaminants present in the public water system and no evidence of microbial contaminants in the public water system . All exemptions granted with respect to a contaminant level or treatment technique prescribed by the Federal regulation shall expire no later than the dates prescribed in the Federal act.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0874PN0910 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122